North Carolina, session 2025, HB237.
General Assembly of North Carolina enacts:

PART I. CHILD WELFARE LAW REFORMS
SECTION 1.(a) G.S. 7B-100 reads as rewritten:
"§ 7B-100. Purpose.
This Subchapter shall be interpreted and construed so as to implement the following purposes
and policies:
…
(5) To provide standards, consistent with the Adoption and Safe Families Act of
1997, P.L. 105-89, for ensuring that the best interests of the juvenile are of
paramount consideration by the court and that when it is not in the juvenile's
best interest to be returned home, the juvenile will be placed in a safe,
permanent home within a reasonable amount of time.one year from the date
of the initial order removing custody."
SECTION 1.(b) G.S. 7B-101 reads as rewritten:
"§ 7B-101. Definitions.
As used in this Subchapter, unless the context clearly requires otherwise, the following words
have the listed meanings:
(1) Abused juveniles. – Any juvenile less than 18 years of age (i) who is found to
be a minor victim of human trafficking under G.S. 14-43.15 or unlawful sale,
surrender, or purchase of a minor under G.S. 14-43.14 or (ii) whose parent,
guardian, custodian, or caretaker:
…
d. Commits, permits, or encourages the commission of a violation of the
following laws by, with, or upon the juvenile: first-degree forcible
rape, as provided in G.S. 14-27.21; second-degree forcible rape as
provided in G.S. 14-27.22; statutory rape of a child by an adult as
provided in G.S. 14-27.23; first-degree statutory rape as provided in
G.S. 14-27.24; first-degree forcible sex offense as provided in
G.S. 14-27.26; second-degree forcible sex offense as provided in
*H237-v-2*

General Assembly Of North Carolina Session 2025
G.S. 14-27.27; statutory sexual offense with a child by an adult as
provided in G.S. 14-27.28; first-degree statutory sexual offense as
provided in G.S. 14-27.29; sexual activity by a substitute parent or
custodian as provided in G.S. 14-27.31; sexual activity with a student
as provided in G.S. 14-27.32; unlawful sale, surrender, or purchase of
a minor, as provided in G.S. 14-43.14; a sexually violent offense, as
provided in G.S. 14-208.6(5); crime against nature, as provided in
G.S. 14-177; incest, as provided in G.S. 14-178; preparation of
obscene photographs, slides, or motion pictures of the juvenile, as
provided in G.S. 14-190.5; employing or permitting the juvenile to
assist in a violation of the obscenity laws as provided in G.S. 14-190.6;
dissemination of obscene material to the juvenile as provided in
G.S. 14-190.7 and G.S. 14-190.8; and displaying or disseminating
material harmful to the juvenile as provided in G.S. 14-190.14 and
G.S. 14-190.15; first and second degree sexual exploitation of the
juvenile as provided in G.S. 14-190.16 and G.S. 14-190.17; promoting
the prostitution of the juvenile as provided in G.S. 14-205.3(b); and
taking indecent liberties with the juvenile, as provided in
G.S. 14-202.1;G.S. 14-190.15.
…
(15) Neglected juvenile. – Any juvenile less than 18 years of age (i) who is found
to be a minor victim of human trafficking under G.S. 14-43.15 or (ii) whose
parent, guardian, custodian, or caretaker does any of the following:
…
h. Uses an illegal substance, abuses alcohol, or uses a controlled
substance in violation of the law and is unable to care for and provide
a safe and appropriate home for the juvenile.
i. Uses an illegal substance, abuses alcohol, or uses a controlled
substance in violation of the law while a child is in utero.
In determining whether a juvenile is a neglected juvenile, it is relevant whether
that juvenile lives in a home where another juvenile has died as a result of
suspected abuse or neglect or lives in a home where another juvenile has been
subjected to abuse or neglect by an adult who regularly lives in the home.
…."
SECTION 1.(c) G.S. 7B-503(a) reads as rewritten:
"(a) When a request is made for nonsecure custody, the court shall first consider release
of the juvenile to the juvenile's parent, relative, guardian, custodian, or other responsible adult.
An order for nonsecure custody shall be made only when there is a reasonable factual basis to
believe the matters alleged in the petition are true, and any of the following apply:
…
(7) The juvenile is an infant who was born exposed to alcohol, illegal substances,
or controlled substances used in violation of the law. If the parent is enrolled
in and meeting or exceeding the benchmarks of a substance abuse treatment
program recommended by a medical provider or a local management
entity/managed care organization (LME/MCO), then any use of alcohol,
illegal substances, or controlled substances in violation of the law shall not be
the sole ground for ordering nonsecure custody.
A juvenile alleged to be abused, neglected, or dependent shall be placed in nonsecure custody
only when there is a reasonable factual basis to believe that there are no other reasonable means
available to protect the juvenile. The developmental and attachment needs of the juvenile must
Page 2 House Bill 237-Second Edition

General Assembly Of North Carolina Session 2025
be considered in making nonsecure custody determinations. In no case shall a juvenile alleged to
be abused, neglected, or dependent be placed in secure custody."
SECTION 1.(d) G.S. 7B-505(b) reads as rewritten:
"(b) The court shall order the department of social services to make diligent efforts to
notify relatives and other persons with legal custody of a sibling of the juvenile that the juvenile
is in nonsecure custody and of any hearings scheduled to occur pursuant to G.S. 7B-506, unless
the court finds the notification would be contrary to the best interests of the juvenile. The
department of social services shall use due diligence to identify and notify adult relatives
relatives, next of kin, and other persons with legal custody of a sibling of the juvenile within 30
days after the initial order removing custody. The department shall file with the court information
regarding attempts made to identify and notify adult relatives of the juvenile and persons with
legal custody of a sibling of the juvenile. In placing a juvenile in nonsecure custody under this
section, the court shall first consider whether a relative of the juvenile is willing and able to
provide proper care and supervision of the juvenile in a safe home. If the court finds that the
relative is willing and able to provide proper care and supervision in a safe home, then the court
shall order placement of the juvenile with the relative unless the court finds that placement with
the relative would be contrary to the best interests of the juvenile. The developmental and
attachment needs of the child shall be considered by the court when determining whether
placement with the relative would be contrary to the best interest of the juvenile."
SECTION 1.(e) G.S. 7B-901(c) reads as rewritten:
"(c) If the disposition order places a juvenile in the custody of a county department of
social services, the court shall direct that reasonable efforts for reunification as defined in
G.S. 7B-101 shall not be required if the court makes written findings of fact pertaining to any of
the following, unless the court concludes that there is compelling evidence warranting continued
reunification efforts:
(1) A court of competent jurisdiction determines or has determined that
aggravated circumstances exist because the parent has committed or
encouraged the commission of, or allowed the continuation of, any of the
following upon the juvenile:
…
e. Chronic or toxic exposure to alcohol or controlled substances that
causes impairment of or addiction in the juvenile.juvenile, including
in utero exposure to alcohol, illegal substances, or controlled
substances used in violation of the law. The court shall consider
whether a parent is enrolled in and meeting or exceeding the
benchmarks of a substance abuse treatment program recommended by
a medical provider or a local management entity/managed care
organization (LME/MCO).
…."
SECTION 1.(f) G.S. 7B-903 reads as rewritten:
"§ 7B-903. Dispositional alternatives for abused, neglected, or dependent juvenile.
…
(a1) In placing a juvenile in out-of-home care under this section, the court shall first
consider whether a relative of the juvenile is willing and able to provide proper care and
supervision of the juvenile in a safe home. If the court finds that the relative is willing and able
to provide proper care and supervision in a safe home, then the court shall order placement of the
juvenile with the relative unless the court finds that the placement is contrary to the best interests
of the juvenile. The developmental and attachment needs of the child shall be considered by the
court when determining whether placement with the relative would be contrary to the best interest
of the juvenile. In placing a juvenile in out-of-home care under this section, the court shall also
consider whether it is in the juvenile's best interest to remain in the juvenile's community of
House Bill 237-Second Edition Page 3

General Assembly Of North Carolina Session 2025
residence. Placement of a juvenile with a relative outside of this State must be in accordance with
the Interstate Compact on the Placement of Children.
…
(a5) Once a juvenile who is not a member of a State-recognized tribe as set forth in
G.S. 143B-407(a) has resided in the home of a foster parent for a continuous period of at least
nine months, the foster parent is deemed to be nonrelative kin for purposes of this section.
…."
SECTION 1.(g) G.S. 7B-903.1(c) reads as rewritten:
"(c) If a juvenile is removed from the home and placed in the custody or placement
responsibility of a county department of social services, the director shall not allow unsupervised
visitation with or return physical custody of the juvenile to the parent, guardian, custodian, or
caretaker without a hearing at which the court finds that the juvenile will receive proper care and
supervision in a safe home. Before a county department of social services may recommend
unsupervised visits or return of physical custody of the juvenile juvenile, whichever occurs first,
to the parent, guardian, custodian, or caretaker from whom the juvenile was removed, a county
department of social services shall first observe that parent, guardian, custodian, or caretaker with
the juvenile for at least two visits that support the recommendation. Each observation visit shall
consist of an observation of not less than one hour with the juvenile, shall be conducted at least
seven days apart, and shall occur within 30 days of the hearing at which the department of social
services makes the recommendation. A department of social services shall provide
documentation of any observation visits that it conducts to the court for its consideration as to
whether unsupervised visits or physical custody custody, whichever occurs first, should be
granted to the parent, guardian, custodian, or caretaker from whom the juvenile was removed."
SECTION 1.(h) G.S. 7B-906.1 reads as rewritten:
"§ 7B-906.1. Review and permanency planning hearings.
(a) The court shall conduct a review or permanency planning hearing within 90 days from
the date of the initial dispositional hearing held pursuant to G.S. 7B-901. Review or permanency
planning hearings shall be held at least every six months thereafter. If custody has not been
removed from a parent, guardian, caretaker, or custodian, the hearing shall be designated as a
review hearing. If custody has been removed from a parent, guardian, or custodian, or the juvenile
was residing with a caretaker at the time the petition was filed, the hearing shall be designated as
a permanency planning hearing.
…
(d) At each hearing, the court shall consider the following criteria and make written
findings regarding those that are relevant:
…
(1a) Reports on the juvenile's continuation in the home of the parent, guardian, or
custodian; and the appropriateness of the juvenile's continuation in that home.
If the juvenile is removed from the custody of a parent, guardian, or custodian
at a review hearing, the court shall schedule a permanency planning hearing
within 30 days of the review, unless the hearing was noticed and heard as a
permanency planning hearing.review.
…
(3) Whether efforts to reunite the juvenile with either parent clearly would be
unsuccessful or inconsistent with the juvenile's health or safety and need for a
safe, permanent home within a reasonable period of time. one year from the
date the initial order removing custody was entered, including whether a
parent has engaged in any of the factors described under G.S. 7B-901(c). The
court shall consider efforts to reunite regardless of whether the juvenile
resided with the parent, guardian, or custodian at the time of removal.
…
Page 4 House Bill 237-Second Edition

General Assembly Of North Carolina Session 2025
(i) The At any permanency planning hearing, the court may maintain the juvenile's
placement under review or order a different placement, appoint a guardian of the person for the
juvenile pursuant to G.S. 7B-600, or order any disposition authorized by G.S. 7B-903, including
the authority to place the child in the custody of either parent or any relative found by the court
to be suitable and found by the court to be in the best interests of the juvenile.
…
(l) If the court orders or continues the juvenile's placement in the custody or placement
responsibility of a county department of social services, the provisions of G.S. 7B-903.1 shall
apply to any order entered under this section.
…
(n) Notwithstanding other provisions of this Article, the court may waive the holding of
permanency planning hearings required by this section, may require written reports to the court
by the agency or person holding custody in lieu of permanency planning hearings, or order that
permanency planning hearings be held less often than every six months if the court finds by clear,
cogent, clear and convincing evidence each of the following:
(1) The juvenile has resided in the placement for a period of at least one year or
the juvenile has resided in the placement for at least six consecutive months
the parties are in agreement and the court enters a consent order pursuant to
G.S. 7B-801(b1).
(2) The placement is stable, and continuation of the placement is in the juvenile's
best interests.
(3) Neither the juvenile's best interests nor the rights of any party require that
permanency planning hearings be held every six months.
(4) All parties are aware that the matter may be brought before the court for
review at any time by the filing of a permanency planning or modification
motion for review or on the court's own motion.
(5) The court order has designated the relative or other suitable person as the
juvenile's permanent custodian or guardian of the person.
The court may not waive or refuse to conduct a hearing if a party files a motion seeking the
hearing. However, if a guardian of the person has been appointed for the juvenile and the court
has also made findings in accordance with subsection (n) of this section that guardianship is the
permanent plan for the juvenile, the court shall proceed in accordance with apply the criteria of
G.S. 7B-600(b).
…."
SECTION 1.(i) G.S. 7B-1103(a) reads as rewritten:
"(a) A petition or motion to terminate the parental rights of either or both parents to his,
her, or their minor juvenile may only be filed by one or more of the following:
…
(5) Any person with whom the juvenile has resided for a continuous period of 18
15 months or more next preceding the filing of the petition or motion.
…."
SECTION 1.(j) G.S. 7B-1109(f) reads as rewritten:
"(f) The burden in such proceedings shall be upon the petitioner or movant and all findings
of fact shall be based on clear, cogent, clear and convincing evidence. The rules of evidence in
civil cases shall apply. No husband-wife or physician-patient privilege shall be grounds for
excluding any evidence regarding the existence or nonexistence of any circumstance authorizing
the termination of parental rights."
SECTION 1.(k) G.S. 7B-1111(a) reads as rewritten:
"(a) The court may terminate the parental rights upon a finding of one or more of the
following:
…
House Bill 237-Second Edition Page 5

General Assembly Of North Carolina Session 2025
(2) The parent has willfully left the juvenile in foster care or placement outside
the home for more than 12 nine months without showing to the satisfaction of
the court that reasonable progress under the circumstances has been made in
correcting those conditions which led to the removal of the juvenile. No
parental rights, however, shall be terminated for the sole reason that the
parents are unable to care for the juvenile on account of their poverty.
…."
SECTION 1.(l) This section becomes effective October 1, 2025, and applies to
petitions or motions to terminate parental rights filed on or after that date.

PART II. REGIONAL ABUSE AND MEDICAL SPECIALIST PROGRAM
SECTION 2.(a) The Regional Abuse and Medical Specialist (RAMS) program
staffed within the North Carolina Child Medical Evaluation Program (NC CMEP) through one
or more contracts or memorandums of understanding between the Department of Health and
Human Services and the Pediatric Department of the UNC School of Medicine is immediately
stayed pending compliance with the following:
(1) Establishment of rules for the program in compliance with Chapter 150A of
the General Statutes.
(2) Amendment of and federal approval of any State plan, which is required to
comply with federal laws and regulations and maintain federal funding.
(3) Federal approval of rules for the RAMS program, which is required to comply
with federal laws and regulations and maintain federal funding.
If necessary, any contracts or memorandums of understanding between the
Department of Health and Human Services and the UNC School of Medicine regarding the
RAMS program shall be modified to comply with the provisions of this section.
SECTION 2.(b) The Social Services Commission shall adopt temporary and
permanent rules to implement the RAMS program which shall include:
(1) Limiting the RAMS team's focus to screened in cases meeting one or more of
the following criteria:
a. The child is less than 4 years of age and presents with unexplained or
poorly explained injuries. Injuries would not be considered poorly
explained or unexplained in cases where the discipline or action by the
caretaker explains the child's injury and the reporting medical provider
states that the mechanism of the injury is plausible for having caused
the injury.
b. The child is less than 4 years of age and there is a concern for a
sexually transmitted infection.
c. The child is less than 4 years of age and another child who lives in the
home died as a result of suspected abuse or neglect.
d. There is concern for medical child abuse (Munchausen by Proxy) to a
child of any age.
e. The child, regardless of age, has a medically complex issue and one or
more of the following is present:
1. The child requires subspecialty care by two or more specialists.
2. A second report of medical neglect is received within six
months regardless of the prior case outcome.
3. The child requires devices to sustain their function such as a
tracheostomy or g-tube.
f. The child is a substance-affected infant.
(2) Requiring the RAMS team to be contacted if the following criteria are met:
Page 6 House Bill 237-Second Edition

General Assembly Of North Carolina Session 2025
a. The report of abuse or neglect is screened in for a family or
investigative assessment by the local county child welfare agency.
b. One or more of the criteria of subdivision (1) of this subsection are
present.
(3) Requiring the RAMS team to cease involvement upon a determination that the
child does not meet the criteria of subdivision (2) of this subsection or upon
the final case decision resulting from the family or investigative assessment,
whichever shall occur first.
(4) Requiring the county director of social services to decide issues where a
disagreement between the local social services worker and the RAMS team
arises, including:
a. Whether the child meets the criteria of subdivision (2) of this
subsection.
b. The course of action to be taken during the family or investigative
assessment.
c. The ultimate decision arising from the family or investigative
assessment.
The county director of social services shall make this determination based on
information contained in the case file provided by the RAMS team, provided
by the county social worker, and, if applicable, provided by the Regional Child
Welfare Consultant. The county director shall make the determination as soon
as possible after notification of the disagreement but no later than 24 hours
after the disagreement arises.
(5) Requiring the social worker assigned to the case to notify the county director
as soon as possible after a disagreement arises between the social worker and
the RAMS team member but no later than four hours after the disagreement
arises.
(6) Requiring the social worker to notify the family to be notified as soon as
possible of any decision impacting the family when the RAMS program is
involved in the family's case but no later than 24 hours after the decision is
made.
(7) Limiting the RAMS program's role to supporting, guiding, and mentoring
county supervisors during the family or investigative assessment phase only.
The county supervisor may include the social worker in meetings with the
RAMS personnel. The recommendations and suggestions made by the RAMS
team are contributions to the county's family or investigative assessment and
are not a complete guide of the assessment. The county must follow the policy
outlined in the Child Protective Services Family and Investigative
Assessments section of the NC Child Welfare policy manual. The county
director is ultimately responsible for the safety and well-being of children in
their county and is tasked with determining whether protective services should
be put in place or a petition filed after making a prompt and thorough
assessment to determine the extent of abuse or neglect against the child and
the risk of future harm to the child.
(8) Establishing the frequency in which the RAMS team member and the county
social worker supervisor must meet during the family or investigative
assessment period.
(9) Establishing the documentation or information which must be provided to the
RAMS team during the family or investigative assessment period.
(10) Allowing the parent, guardian, or caretaker of the child who is subject to the
report of alleged abuse or neglect or their attorney to access all documentation
House Bill 237-Second Edition Page 7

General Assembly Of North Carolina Session 2025
provided to or generated by the RAMS team during and after the RAMS
team's involvement in the matter.
SECTION 2.(c) No later than 30 days after the rulemaking process is complete, the
Secretary of the North Carolina Department of Health and Human Services or the Secretary's
designee shall submit to the United States Secretary of Health and Human Services or the U.S.
Secretary's designee for approval of the following:
(1) A draft of the proposed new rules outlined in subsection (b) of this section.
(2) Any proposed changes to the State plan necessitated by the proposed rules to
ensure there is no reduction or elimination of federal funding from any source.
SECTION 2.(d) The Social Services Commission shall initiate temporary and
permanent rulemaking within 30 days of this act becoming effective.
SECTION 2.(e) If the United States Secretary of Health and Human Services or the
U.S. Secretary's designee determines that any proposed rule, statute, or plan amendment
submitted under subsection (c) of this section would negatively impact federal funding provided
to North Carolina, then the proposed rules, statutes, and plan amendments submitted shall not
become effective. The North Carolina Secretary of Health and Human Services or the Secretary's
designee shall notify the Social Services Commission and Rules Review Commission of the
United States Department of Health and Human Services' determination regarding the proposed
rules, statutes, and plan amendments submitted under subsection (c) of this section within five
days of receipt.
SECTION 2.(f) The Division shall report to the Joint Legislative Oversight
Committee on Health and Human Services, the chairs of the House Appropriations Committee
on Health and Human Services, the chairs of the Senate Appropriations Committee on Health
and Human Services, and the Joint Legislative Administrative Procedures Oversight Committee
by September 1, 2025, and each year thereafter, on the hiring, training, and oversight of the
RAMS program and, if applicable, the progress being made regarding the rulemaking process as
provided for in this section. A copy of all reports and plans submitted to the federal government
which includes information regarding the RAMS program shall be simultaneously provided to
the Joint Legislative Oversight Committee on Health and Human Services, the chairs of the
House Appropriations Committee on Health and Human Services, the chairs of the Senate
Appropriations Committee on Health and Human Services, and the Joint Legislative
Administrative Procedures Oversight Committee.
SECTION 2.(g) This section is effective when it becomes law. If approval by the
United States Secretary of Health and Human Services is not required for any State plan
amendments or for the proposed rules, the proposed rules shall become effective as provided for
in G.S. 150B-21.3. If approval by the United States Secretary of Health and Human Services is
required for the proposed rules created pursuant to subsection (a) of this section, or if any
amendments to the State plan are necessary because of the proposed rules, the proposed rules
shall be effective on the first day of the month that follows the date that the Secretary of the North
Carolina Department of Health and Human Services receives notification of approval by the
United States Secretary of Health and Human Services and as provided for in G.S. 150B-21.3.
The Secretary of the North Carolina Department of Health and Human Services shall report to
the Revisor of Statutes the applicable effective date once known.

PART III. PRIVATE CAUSE OF ACTION
SECTION 3.(a) Part 1 of Article 3 of Chapter 143B of the General Statutes is
amended by adding a new section to read:
"§ 143B-138.1A. Private cause of action.
If the Secretary of the Department or the Secretary's designee takes any action or causes any
action to be taken against an individual through a program created, administered, supervised, or
funded by the Department that is operating without going through the required rulemaking
Page 8 House Bill 237-Second Edition

General Assembly Of North Carolina Session 2025
process and the individual experiences a loss or harm, including court costs, attorneys' fees, and
other litigation costs, that individual shall have a private cause of action against the Department.
The individual must prevail on any claim to be eligible for an award of court costs, attorneys'
fees, and other litigation costs."
SECTION 3.(b) This section becomes effective October 1, 2025, and is applicable
to actions taken by the Department on or after that date.

PART IV. EDUCATION AND TRAINING REQUIREMENTS FOR COUNTY SOCIAL
SERVICES BOARD MEMBERS, REGIONAL SOCIAL SERVICES BOARD
MEMBERS, CONSOLIDATED HUMAN SERVICES BOARD MEMBERS, AND
COUNTY COMMISSIONERS
SECTION 4.(a) G.S. 108A-9 reads as rewritten:
"§ 108A-9. Duties and responsibilities.
The county board of social services shall have the following duties and responsibilities:
(1) To select the county director of social services according to the merit system
rules of the North Carolina Human Resources Commission;Commission.
(2) To advise county and municipal authorities in developing policies and plans
to improve the social conditions of the community;community.
(3) To consult with the director of social services about problems relating to his
office, and to assist him in planning budgets for the county department of
social services;services.
(4) To transmit or present the budgets of the county department of social services
for public assistance, social services, and administration to the board of county
commissioners;commissioners.
(4a) To attend education and training sessions provided for new board members
during the first year they serve on the board.
(5) To have such other duties and responsibilities as the General Assembly, the
Department of Health and Human Services or the Social Services Commission
or the board of county commissioners may assign to it."
SECTION 4.(b) G.S. 108A-15.8 reads as rewritten:
"§ 108A-15.8. Regional board of social services.
…
(m) All regional boards of social services members shall attend education and training
sessions provided for new board members during the first year they serve on the board."
SECTION 4.(c) The Department of Health and Human Services, Division of Social
Services, shall collaborate with key stakeholders, including the North Carolina Association of
County Boards of Social Services, the Association of North Carolina County Social Services
Directors, the North Carolina Association of County Commissioners, and the University of North
Carolina School of Government, to create formal education and training sessions for new county
board of social services members in accordance with G.S. 108A-9(4a), as enacted in subsection
(a) of this section, and G.S. 108A-15.8(m), as enacted in subsection (b) of this section. The
education and training sessions shall include a segment on the potential liabilities of the county
or regional board of social services. The education and training sessions shall be available
statewide by March 1, 2026.
SECTION 4.(d) G.S. 153A-77(d) reads as rewritten:
"§ 153A-77. Authority of boards of commissioners over commissions, boards, agencies, etc.
…
(d) The consolidated human services board shall have authority to:
(1) Set fees for departmental services based upon recommendations of the human
services director. Fees set under this subdivision are subject to the same
restrictions on amount and scope that would apply if the fees were set by a
House Bill 237-Second Edition Page 9

General Assembly Of North Carolina Session 2025
county board of health, a county board of social services, or a mental health,
developmental disabilities, and substance abuse area authority.
(2) Assure compliance with laws related to State and federal programs.
(3) Recommend creation of local human services programs.
(4) Adopt local health regulations and participate in enforcement appeals of local
regulations.
(5) Perform regulatory health functions required by State law.
(6) Act as coordinator or agent of the State to the extent required by State or
federal law.
(7) Plan and recommend a consolidated human services budget.
(8) Conduct audits and reviews of human services programs, including quality
assurance activities, as required by State and federal law or as may otherwise
be necessary periodically.
(9) Advise local officials through the county manager.
(10) Perform public relations and advocacy functions.
(11) Protect the public health to the extent required by law.
(12) Perform comprehensive mental health services planning if the county is
exercising the powers and duties of an area mental health, developmental
disabilities, and substance abuse services board under the consolidated human
services board.
(13) Develop dispute resolution procedures for human services contractors and
clients and public advocates, subject to applicable State and federal dispute
resolution procedures for human services programs, when applicable.
Except as otherwise provided, the consolidated human services board shall have the powers
and duties conferred by law upon a board of health, a social services board, and an area mental
health, developmental disabilities, and substance abuse services board.
All consolidated human services board members shall attend education and training sessions
provided for new board members during the first year they serve on the board.
Local employees who serve as staff of a consolidated county human services agency are
subject to county personnel policies and ordinances only and are not subject to the provisions of
the North Carolina Human Resources Act, unless the county board of commissioners elects to
subject the local employees to the provisions of that Act. All consolidated county human services
agencies shall comply with all applicable federal laws, rules, and regulations requiring the
establishment of merit personnel systems."
SECTION 4.(e) The Divisions of Social Services, Public Health, and Mental Health,
Developmental Disabilities, and Substance Use Services of the Department of Health and Human
Services shall collaborate with key stakeholders, including the North Carolina Association of
County Boards of Social Services, the Association of North Carolina County Social Services
Directors, the North Carolina Association of County Commissioners, the Association of North
Carolina Boards of Health, the Commission for Mental Health, Developmental Disabilities, and
Substance Abuse Services, and the University of North Carolina School of Government, to create
formal education and training sessions for new consolidated human services board members in
accordance with G.S. 153A-77(d), as amended in subsection (d) of this section. The education
and training sessions shall include a segment on the potential liabilities of the consolidated human
services board. The education and training sessions shall be available statewide by March 1,
2026.
SECTION 4.(f) Subsections (a), (b), and (d) of this section become effective March
1, 2026, and by March 1, 2027, all current county board of social services members must have
participated in the education and training sessions provided in G.S. 108A-9(4a), as enacted by
this act, all current regional board of social services members must have participated in the
education and training sessions provided in G.S. 108A-15.8(m), as enacted by this act, and all
Page 10 House Bill 237-Second Edition

General Assembly Of North Carolina Session 2025
current consolidated human services board members must have participated in the education and
training sessions provided in G.S. 153A-77(d), as amended by this act. The remainder of this
section is effective when it becomes law.

PART V. CHILD SUPPORT TRIBUNAL STUDY BY THE ADMINISTRATIVE OFFICE
OF THE COURTS
SECTION 5. The Administrative Office of the Courts shall conduct a feasibility and
cost study of a proposed child support tribunal, with dedicated court officers to hear child support
matters, using quasi-judicial procedures. The study shall include, at a minimum, strategies to
address funding, staffing, and a plan for how the proposed changes will be implemented. The
Administrative Office of the Courts shall submit a report of its findings and recommendations to
the Joint Legislative Oversight Committee on Health and Human Services by May 1, 2026.

PART VI. CONFLICTS OF INTEREST WITHIN COUNTY DEPARTMENTS OF
SOCIAL SERVICES
SECTION 6.(a) Part 2B of Article 1 of Chapter 108A of the General Statutes is
amended by adding a new section to read:
"§ 108A-15.16. Conflicts of interest.
When conflicts of interest arise in the provision of social services provided by county
departments of social services, regional departments of social services, or consolidated human
services agencies, the office in which the conflict arose shall work expeditiously to resolve the
conflict consistent with applicable law and any policies and procedures established by the
Department of Health and Human Services. Policies and procedures shall address financial and
practice responsibilities associated with conflicts of interest. Upon identifying a conflict of
interest, the office in which the conflict arose shall notify the appropriate authority within the
Department of Health and Human Services of the conflict. The Department of Health and Human
Services shall have authority to make final decisions regarding conflicts of interest assignments
when disputes arise, with the regional office having initial authority when a dispute arises
between county departments of social services and consolidated human services agencies, unless
no regional office is available, then the central office, and the central office having initial
authority when disputes arise between regions. For purposes of this section, a "conflict of
interest" occurs when at least one of the following occurs:
(1) A county department of social services, regional department of social services,
or consolidated human services agency is not able to manage the adverse
interests of two individuals to whom the office owes a duty to serve.
(2) A preexisting relationship between an individual and a county that results in
a county department of social services', regional department of social
services', or consolidated human services agency's inability to objectively
fulfill its statutory responsibilities.
(3) The provision of social services and duty owed by a county department of
social services, regional department of social services, or consolidated human
services agency conflicts with services and the duty owed by another county
department of social services, regional department of social services, or
consolidated human services agency."
SECTION 6.(b) The Social Services Commission shall adopt rules regarding
conflicts of interest management, including establishing reasonable and specific time lines for
resolving conflicts of interest, and shall begin the rulemaking process within 30 days of this
section becoming law.
SECTION 6.(c) The Social Services Commission shall report to the Joint Legislative
Oversight Committee on Health and Human Services upon adopting rules pursuant to
House Bill 237-Second Edition Page 11

General Assembly Of North Carolina Session 2025
G.S. 108A-15.16, as enacted in subsection (b) of this section, within 30 days of the adoption of
the rules.

PART VII. INTERIM STUDY COMMITTEE TO REVIEW CHILD WELFARE
PROGRAMS, POLICIES, AND PROCEDURES AND REVIEW NORTH CAROLINA
DEPARTMENT OF HEALTH AND HUMAN SERVICES' COMPLIANCE WITH
RULEMAKING REQUIREMENTS
SECTION 7.(a) The Joint Legislative Oversight Committee (Committee) on Health
and Human Services shall do all of the following:
(1) Study, evaluate, and make recommendations on the following:
a. Creating a Foster Ombudsman program, including review of House
Bill 665 from the 2023-2024 biennium and House Bill 165 from the
current biennium, review of Foster Ombudsman programs and their
effectiveness in other states, including Maryland and Texas, and the
cost of implementing a Foster Ombudsman program in North
Carolina.
b. Working with churches and nonprofit/private organizations to provide
services and close gaps in services and needs of foster children, foster
families, kinship care providers, and to aid in keeping families
together, including Least of These, Safe Families for Children, and
Adoption-Share.
c. Requiring the North Carolina Department of Health and Human
Services (DHHS) to review all outstanding policies and guidance that
did not go through the proper rulemaking process and requiring DHHS
to do so.
d. Requiring foster parent and kinship care providers' participation in
court proceedings.
(2) Work with DHHS and county department of social services boards to create
more uniform standards regarding child welfare matters and make
recommendations based on this work.
(3) Follow up with DHHS for updated information on the work being done by the
Child Welfare and Family Well-Being Transformation Team since its May
2022 interim report and make recommendations based on the information
provided.
(4) Follow up with DHHS regarding status of regional offices required under
Ryan's Law (S.L. 2017-41) including services provided, and
recommendations for statewide, uniform standards in handling child welfare
matters and areas for improving the delivery of child welfare services and
make recommendations based on the information provided.
(5) Work with the Chief Justice of the Supreme Court and his team regarding
improvements to child welfare/foster/adoption cases, obtain any updates by
Chief Justice Newby's Task Force of Adverse Childhood Experience (ACE)
Informed Courts since the release of its final report in December 2023, and
make recommendations based on the information provided.
(6) Follow up with DHHS on the status of the development and implementation
of innovative Medicaid services to fill gaps in care for foster children with
behavioral health needs and a statewide trauma-informed standardized
assessment for foster cases, the status of the working group required to be
established under Section 9E.21 of S.L. 2023-134, and make
recommendations based on the information provided.
Page 12 House Bill 237-Second Edition

General Assembly Of North Carolina Session 2025
(7) Any other issues which the committee deems appropriate for the improvement
of the child welfare system.
SECTION 7.(b) The Committee shall report its findings and any legislative
recommendations to the 2026 Regular Session of the 2025 General Assembly prior to its
convening.

PART VIII. EFFECTIVE DATE
SECTION 8. Except as otherwise provided, this act is effective when it becomes
law.
House Bill 237-Second Edition Page 13